apertium-guj.guj.dix
	<pardef n="રમ/વું__tv_vblex">
		<e><p><l>વું</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

	<!--simple present-->
		<e><p><l>ું</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ીએ</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>ે</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: non-honorific : tu-->
		<e><p><l>ો</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: honorific : tame -->

		<e><p><l>ે</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ે</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>ું</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ીએ</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>ે</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: non-honorific : tu-->
		<e><p><l>ો</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: honorific : tame -->

		<e><p><l>ે</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ે</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

	<!--simple future-->
		<e><p><l>ીશ</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ીશું</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>શે</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: non-honorific : tu-->
		<e><p><l>શો</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: honorific : tame -->

		<e><p><l>શે</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>શે</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>ું</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ીએ</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>ે</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: non-honorific : tu-->
		<e><p><l>ો</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: honorific : tame -->

		<e><p><l>ે</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ે</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      	<e><p><l>વાનું</l><r>વું<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: recheck-->

	</pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->
    
    <pardef n="જેમ્સ__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
    </pardef>  
            
    <pardef n="મેરી__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
    </pardef>    

    <pardef n="પટેલ__np">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ભારત__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ટાટા__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ઉત્તર__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

    <e lm="મેરી"><i>મેરી</i><par n="મેરી__np"/></e>
    <e lm="જેમ્સ"><i>જેમ્સ</i><par n="જેમ્સ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="કાજોલ"><i>કાજોલ</i><par n="મેરી__np"/></e>
    <e lm="રાહુલ"><i>રાહુલ</i><par n="જેમ્સ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="રમવું"><i>રમ</i><par n="રમ/વું__tv_vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ગમવું"><i>ગમ</i><par n="રમ/વું__tv_vblex"/></e>
